dictsource/uk_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
/// Spelling to phoneme words and exceptions for Ukrainian
// Author: Andrij Mizyk <andm1zyk@proton.me>, 2022

.group а
       а     a

.group б
       б     b

.group в
       в     v#     // [ʋ] before a vowel: вода. A sonorant, so it never voices
                    // the consonant before it (молитва [mɔlɪtʋa], not [-dβa])
       в (C  w      // [u̯] before a consonant: правда [prau̯da], вчора
       в (_  w      // and at the end of a word: обійшов [ɔbʲiɪ̯ʃɔu̯], в хаті
       в (о  w      // rounded before о, у: вода [wɔda]
       в (у  w

.group г
       г     h  // вимовляється як середнє між г та х

.group ґ
       ґ     g

.group д
       д     d
       дж    dZ

.group е
       е     E

.group є
       є     jE
    C) є     ;E      // after a consonant it softens it: синє [sɪnʲɛ]

.group ж
       ж     Z

.group з
       з     z

.group и
       и     I

.group і
       і     i:

.group ї
       ї     ji:

.group й
       й     j

.group к
       к     k

.group л
       л     l
       л (і  l^
       лє    l^E
       лю    l^u
       ля    l^a
       ль    l^

.group м
       м     m

.group н
       н     n
       н (і  n^
       нє    n^E
       ню    n^u
       ня    n^a
       нь    n^

.group о
       о     o

.group п
       п     p

.group р
       р     R

.group с
       с     s

.group т
       т     t[
       ть    t;

.group у
       у     u

.group ф
       ф     f

.group х
       х     x

.group ц
       ц     ts

.group ч
       ч     tS

.group ш
       ш     S
       ш (в  l#  // швеція

.group щ
       щ     StS

.group ь
       ь     ;

.group ю
       ю     ju
    C) ю     ;u      // after a consonant it softens it: пшеницю [pʃenɪtsʲu]

.group я
       я     ja
    C) я     ;a      // after a consonant it softens it: свято [sʋʲato]

.group ʼ
       ʼ     |
